Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 3. Pat Harrison Waterway District.
§ 51-15-129.
District funding.

In each county of the State of Mississippi which is a part of the Pat Harrison Waterway District, so long as funds are found to be necessary for the operation of the district by annual legislative approval of the district budget, the tax collector of such county shall pay into the depository selected by the water district for such purpose an amount to be determined as follows: each county shall pay a pro rata share (not to exceed the avails of one (1) mill through September 30, 1997, and not to exceed the avails of three-fourths (3/4) mill through September 30, 2005, and not to exceed seven-eighths (7/8) mill thereafter) of the annual district budget based on the proportion that the most recent total assessed valuation of the county bears to the most recent aggregate total assessed valuation of all the counties which comprise the district; provided, however, that any county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico which by action of the board of supervisors has created and authorized a port authority and which has been paying into the port authority the avails of a two-mill levy that was established under Section 27-39-3 shall pay an amount not to exceed one-tenth (1/10) mill through September 30, 2005, and not to exceed two-tenths (2/10) mill thereafter, of the total assessed valuation of the county to the Pat Harrison Waterway District pursuant to this section and the assessed valuation of that county shall not be considered when calculating each county’s pro rata share of the district’s budget. Of the amount paid by counties required to pay to the district an amount not to exceed seven-eighths (7/8) mill, an amount equivalent to the avails of one-eighth (1/8) mill shall be utilized to fund flood control, water management and other similar projects as requested by counties in the district. Of the amount paid by counties required to pay to the district an amount not to exceed two-tenths (2/10) mill, an amount equivalent to the avails of one-tenth (1/10) mill shall be utilized to fund flood control, water management and other similar projects as requested by counties in the district. It shall be the duty of the Pat Harrison Waterway District Board of Directors in the month of November annually upon receipt of the total assessed valuation of the member counties, certified by the Department of Revenue, to prepare a request to the board of supervisors of member counties to levy a tax using the formula herein established not to exceed the maximum number of mills authorized by this section. Member counties shall remit their share of the district budget no later than March 1 of each year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-185; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 10; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess., ch. 31, § 3; Laws, 2005, ch. 396, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 336, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 51-15-131.
Board of directors to issue bonds.

The board of directors of the district is hereby authorized and empowered to borrow money or issue bonds of the district for the purpose of paying the cost of acquiring, owning, constructing, operating, repairing, and maintaining the projects and works specified herein, including related facilities and including all financing and financial advisory charges, interest during construction, engineering, architectural, legal, and other expenses incidental to and necessary for the foregoing or for the carrying out of any power conferred by this article. The board of directors is authorized and empowered to borrow money and issue bonds at such times and in such amounts as shall be provided for by resolution of the board of directors, not to exceed the limitation prescribed in Section 51-15-135. All such bonds so issued by said district shall be secured solely by a pledge of the net revenues which may now or hereafter come to the district, and by the pledge of the avails of the ad valorem tax levy provided for in Section 51-15-129. Such bonds shall not constitute general obligations of the State of Mississippi or of the counties comprising said district, and such bonds shall not be secured by a pledge of the full faith, credit, and resources of the state or of the counties. Bonds of the district shall not be included in computing any present or future debt limit of any county in the district under any present or future law. “Revenues” as used in this article shall mean all charges, rentals, tolls, rates, gifts, grants, avails of tax levies, monies, and all other funds coming into the possession of the district by virtue of the provisions of this article, except the proceeds from the sale of bonds issued hereunder. “Net revenues” as used in this article shall mean the revenues after payments of costs and expenses of operation and maintenance of the project and related facilities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-186; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 11; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess., ch. 31, § 4; Laws, 1964, ch. 252; Laws, 2005, ch. 396, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 51-15-133.
Details of bonds; supplemental powers conferred in issuance of bonds.

All bonds provided for by Section 51-15-131 shall be negotiable instruments within the meaning of the Uniform Commercial Code of this state, shall be lithographed or engraved and printed in two (2) or more colors to prevent counterfeiting, shall be in denominations of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), shall be registered as issued, and shall be numbered in a regular series from one (1) upward. Each bond shall specify on its face the purpose for which it was issued and the total amount authorized to be issued, it shall be payable to bearer, and the interest to accrue thereon shall be evidenced by proper coupons to be attached thereto. The bonds shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-101. They shall mature annually in such amounts and at such times as shall be provided by the resolution of the board of directors. No bond shall have a longer maturity than forty (40) years, and the first maturity date thereof shall be not more than five (5) years from the date of such bonds. The denomination, form and place or places of payment of the bonds shall be fixed in the resolution of the board of directors of the district. The bonds shall be signed by the president and the secretary of the board with the seal of the district affixed thereto, but the coupons may bear only the facsimile signatures of the president and secretary. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any bond may be for a period not exceeding one (1) year.

The bonds may be called in, paid and redeemed in inverse numerical order on any interest date prior to maturity, upon not less than thirty (30) days’ notice to the paying agent or agents designated in the bonds, and at such premium as may be designated in such bonds.

All such bonds shall contain in substance a statement to the effect that they are secured solely by a pledge of the net revenues of the district, including the avails of the ad valorem tax levy provided for in Section 51-15-129, and that they do not constitute general obligations of the State of Mississippi or of the counties comprising the district, and are not secured by a pledge of the full faith, credit and resources of the state or of the counties.

All the bonds as provided for herein shall be sold for not less than par value plus accrued interest at public sale in the manner provided by Section 31-19-25. No sale shall be at a price so low as to require the payment of interest on the money received therefor at more than eleven percent (11%) per annum computed with relation to the absolute maturity of the bonds, in accordance with standard tables of bond values, excluding from such computation the amount of any premium to be paid on redemption of any bonds prior to maturity.

This article shall be full and complete authority for the issuance of the bonds provided for herein, and no restriction or limitation otherwise prescribed by law shall apply herein.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, bonds referred to hereinabove may be issued pursuant to the supplemental powers and authorizations conferred by the provisions of the Registered Bond Act, being Sections 31-21-1 through 31-21-7.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-187; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 12; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess., ch. 31, § 5; Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 20; Laws, 1989, ch. 456, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 396, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 51-15-135.
Limitation on amount of bonds.

Bonds and other indebtedness issued or incurred pursuant to this article shall not exceed Seven Million Dollars ($7,000,000.00) in principal amount.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-188; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 13; Laws, 1989, ch. 456, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 465, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1996).

§ 51-15-136.
Borrowing money or issuance of bonds after April 6, 1995.

From and after April 6, 1995, the board of directors shall not borrow money or issue bonds of the district unless sixty percent (60%) of the entire membership of the board of directors votes in favor of such action after thirty (30) days’ written notice to the chancery clerks and presidents of the boards of supervisors of the member counties of the date upon which such vote will be taken. Further, the board shall not borrow money or issue bonds of the district from April 6, 1995, through February 1, 1996.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 559, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1995).

§ 51-15-137.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2005, ch. 396, § 5, effective from and after July 1, 2005.

[Codes, 1942, § 5956-189; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 14; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess., ch. 31, § 6; Laws, 1964, ch. 253; Laws, 1995, ch. 559, § 5; Laws, 1996, ch. 465, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1996).]

§ 51-15-139.
Validation of bonds.

All bonds issued pursuant to this article shall be validated as now provided by law of Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972. The services of the state’s bond attorney may be employed in the preparation of such bond resolutions, forms, or proceedings as may be necessary, for which he shall be paid a reasonable fee. Such validation proceedings shall be instituted in the chancery court of the county in which the principal office of the district is located, but notice of such validation proceedings shall be published at least two times in a newspaper of general circulation and published in each of the counties comprising the Pat Harrison Waterway District, the first publication of which in each case shall be made at least ten days preceding the date set for the validation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-190; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 51-15-141.
Trust agreement.

At the discretion of the board of directors of the district any bonds provided for in Section 51-15-131 may be further secured by a trust agreement between the board of directors and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having powers of a trust company within or without the state. Any such trust agreement or any resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as are reasonable and proper and not in violation of law. The trust agreement may contain provision for the issuance of additional bonds for any of the purposes authorized by this article which shall be secured by the revenues pledged thereunder for such bonds to the extent provided therein. The trust agreement may include provisions to the effect that if there is any default in the payment of principal or interest on any of said bonds, any court having jurisdiction of the action may appoint a receiver to administer the properties and facilities of the district, including authority to sell or make contracts for the sale of any services, facilities, or commodities of the district or to renew such contracts, subject to the approval of the court appointing said receiver; and with power to provide for the payment of such bonds outstanding or the payment of operating expenses, and to apply the income and revenues to the payment of said bonds and interest thereon in accordance with the resolution of the board of directors authorizing the issuance of such bonds and said trust agreement. However, the fee for the services of any corporate trustee shall not exceed the normal charges for acting as paying agent plus any additional amount or amounts allowed by the court as the reasonable value of services rendered by the corporate trustee upon default in the payment of principal and interest on the bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-191; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 51-15-143.
Refunding bonds.

The board of directors of the district is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of refunding bonds of the district for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding and issued under authority of this article, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds. The issuance of such refunding bonds, the maturity, and other details thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the board of trustees and of the district in respect to such bonds shall be governed by the provisions of this article, in so far as they are applicable. In no event shall such bonds mature over a period of time exceeding forty years from January 1, 1964.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-192; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 51-15-145.
Bonds to be legal investments.

All bonds of the district are hereby declared to be legal and authorized investments for public funds of counties, cities, towns, school districts, banks, savings banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, and for funds of the Mississippi Public Employees’ Retirement System. Such bonds shall be eligible to secure the deposit of any and all public funds of cities, towns, villages, counties, school districts, or other political corporations or subdivisions of the State of Mississippi; and such bonds shall be lawful and sufficient security for said deposits to the extent of their value, when accompanied by all unmatured coupons appurtenant thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-193; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 51-15-147.
Depository for funds of district.

The board of directors shall designate one or more qualified state depositories within the district to serve as depositories for the funds of the district, and all funds of the district other than funds required by any trust agreement to be deposited, from time to time, with the trustee or any paying agent for outstanding bonds of the district, shall be deposited in such depository or depositories. Any such designated depository shall be eligible to hold funds of the district to the extent that it is qualified as a depository for state funds.

Before designating a depository or depositories, the board of directors shall issue a notice stating the time and place the board will meet for such purpose and inviting the qualified state depositories in the district to submit applications to be designated depositories. The term of service for depositories shall be prescribed by the board. Such notice shall be published one (1) time in a newspaper or newspapers published in the district and specified by the board.

At the time mentioned in the notice, the board shall consider the applications and the management and conditions of the depositories which offer the most favorable terms and conditions for the handling of the funds of the district, and which the board finds have proper management and are in condition to warrant handling of district funds in the manner as provided under the chapter on depositories. Membership on the board of directors of an officer or director of a depository shall not disqualify such depository from being designated as a depository.

If no applications acceptable to the board are received by the time stated in the notice, the board shall designate some qualified state depository or depositories within the district upon such terms and conditions as it may find advantageous to the district. Any such designated depository shall be eligible to hold funds of the district to the extent that it is qualified as a depository for state funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-194; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 19; Laws, 1988, ch. 473, § 14, eff from and after December 1, 1988.

§ 51-15-149.
Agreements relative to federal highways.

The board of directors of the Pat Harrison Waterway District is hereby authorized and empowered to negotiate and contract with the United States of America, or any agency thereof, concerning all lands, easements, and rights of way necessary for the relocation of any federal road, highway, parkway, or for the facilities appurtenant thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-195; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 51-15-151.
Cooperation with other governmental agencies.

The Pat Harrison Waterway District shall have authority to act jointly with political subdivisions of the state and agencies, commissions, and instrumentalities thereof, and with the federal government and other agencies thereof in the performance of the purposes and services authorized in this article, upon such terms as may be agreed upon by the directors.

The board of directors of the district shall have the authority to negotiate and contract with the Secretary of the Army under the provisions of Public Law 653, 85th Congress, or other applicable law or regulation written pursuant thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-196; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 51-15-153.
Water management district law controlling.

The provisions of any other law, general, special, or local, except as provided in this article, shall not limit or restrict the powers granted by this article. The water management district herein provided for shall not be subject to regulation or control by the public service commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-197; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 51-15-155.
District and its bonds exempt from taxation.

The accomplishment of the purposes stated in this article being for the benefit of the people of this state and for the improvement of their properties and industries, the district in carrying out the purposes of this article will be performing an essential public function and shall not be required to pay any tax or assessment on the projects and related facilities or any part thereof; and the interest on the bonds issued hereunder shall at all times be free from taxation within this state. The state hereby covenants with the holders of any bonds to be issued hereunder that the Pat Harrison Waterway District shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments imposed by the state or any of its political subdivisions or taxing districts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-198; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 51-15-157.
Preliminary expenses.

Any municipality or county which is within the territorial limits of the district may advance funds to said district to pay the preliminary expenses, including engineers’ reports, organization, or administration expenses, on such terms of repayment as the governing body of such municipality or county shall determine. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, any such municipality or county is authorized and empowered to borrow money for a period not to exceed one year from the date of such borrowing, for the purpose of making such advances. The board of directors is hereby authorized to repay any such advances from the proceeds of any bonds issued under the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-199; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 51-15-158.
Budget of estimated expenditures for support, maintenance and operation of district.

On or before the fifteenth day of July of each year, the board of directors of the district shall prepare and file with the clerk of the board of supervisors of each member county at least two (2) copies of a budget of estimated expenditures for the support, maintenance and operation of the district for the fiscal year commencing on July 1 of the succeeding year. Such budget shall be prepared on forms prescribed and provided by the State Auditor and shall contain such information as the State Auditor may require.

The board of directors of the district shall notify both the chancery clerk and the president of the board of supervisors of each member county in writing of the date and time when any legislative committee will hold any hearing or vote relating to the budget of the district or any other matter affecting the district. Such notice shall be served both within ten (10) days of the directors’ learning of the date and time of any such action and not less than five (5) days prior to such scheduled action.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 559, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1995).

§ 51-15-159.
Overflow of school lands not to constitute waste.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that the overflow and inundation of sixteenth section lands or in lieu lands shall not constitute legal waste of such lands. The district shall pay a reasonable rental for the use of such lands to be overflowed, and the damages thereof shall be determined by the chancery court of the county in which the land is located. Any sixteenth section lands that have been flooded shall be reforested before this project shall ever be abandoned.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-200; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 25; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess., ch. 31, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Dec. 21, 1962).

§ 51-15-161.
Savings clause.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to violate any provisions of the federal or state constitutions, and all acts done under this article shall be done in such manner as will conform thereto, whether herein expressly provided or not. Where any procedure hereunder may be held by any court to be violative of either of such constitutions, the district shall have the power by resolution to provide any alternative procedure conformable with such constitutions. If any provisions of this article shall be invalid, such fact shall not affect the creation of the district or the validity of any other provision of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-201; Laws, 1962, ch. 222, § 26, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 51-15-163.
Renewal of residential lease from district; determination of maximum annual rental; default or breach.

At any time more than fifteen (15) years after the commencement date of any residential lease from the district, the leaseholder shall have the option to renew and extend the lease for a new sixty-year term by giving the district notice of his exercise of this option to renew.

At any time after the first fifteen (15) years of the term of any residential lease, the then present lessee may obtain from the district a new sixty-year lease on the terms and conditions contained in the then current lease form approved for use in residential leases with the exception of rent. Rent under such sixty-year leases will be payable on the same annual payment date as rent under the lease being renewed. The maximum annual rental under the new lease will be determined by the district as follows:

Renewal of leases with fixed rental (nonescalating).— The district will recompute the annual rental due under the lease being renewed as if the lease had contained annual rents at the fixed amount stated in the lease for the first ten-year period, escalating thereafter at ten percent (10%), rounded to the nearest Five Dollars ($5.00), every five-year period. The annual rental which would have been payable as of the renewal date will be the annual rent payable for the first ten-year period of the renewed lease. Annual rental will escalate thereafter at ten percent (10%), rounded to the nearest Five Dollars ($5.00), every five (5) years. Recomputed annual rental will be payable from and after the first day of the renewed lease term and not for the period prior to renewal.

Renewal of leases with escalating rental.— Annual rental will remain payable in accordance with the terms of the lease being renewed with rental continuing to escalate at ten percent (10%), rounded to the nearest Five Dollars ($5.00), every five (5) years during the renewed term.

The district will charge a reasonable nonrefundable fee for preparation of the renewal lease. The lessee will be responsible for obtaining the consent of any mortgage holder to the lease modification.

At any time a lessee is found to be in default or in breach of the terms and conditions contained in the lease, the district shall give thirty (30) days’ written notice to such lessee before terminating the lease. Such notice shall be by certified mail and shall specifically state the default or breach. If the lessee does not cure the default or breach within thirty (30) days of such notice, then the district shall give written notice to the holder of any mortgage or deed of trust on the leasehold and such holder shall thereupon have thirty (30) days to cure the default or breach before the lease is terminated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 423, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 51-15-165.
Renewal of commercial property lease from district; appraisal establishing fair market rental value required.

Any holder of a lease that is not a residential lease subject to Section 51-15-163 shall have the right, exclusive of all other persons, to renew the lease at fair market rental value at any time prior to expiration of the lease.

Other than the right of a lessee to renew at fair market rental value, nothing in this section is intended to limit or restrict the right of the district to negotiate terms of any lease in furtherance of any of the purposes authorized by this section and in a manner deemed favorable to the district by the board of directors.

Prior to entering into any lease under this section, whether a new or renewal lease, the district shall obtain at least one (1) appraisal from a competent appraiser establishing the fair market rental value of the land, exclusive of improvements made by the leaseholder or any predecessor in title, and, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the land shall not be leased for an amount less than the fair market rental as determined by the appraiser and approved by the board. The district may require such other terms as it deems advisable. The cost of the appraisal shall be paid by the district and may be included in the costs of lease renewal to be reimbursed by the lessee.

The lessee may obtain an appraisal from a certified real estate appraiser establishing the fair market rental value of the land. If the fair market rental value of the land established in such appraisal differs from the fair market rental value of the land established in the appraisal obtained by the district, the land shall not be leased for an amount less than the average of the fair market rental value established by the two (2) appraisals.

For the purposes of this section, “terms” means rent, rent escalation clauses, rental adjustment periods and method of determination, term of years, permitted use, condition of improvements, removal of improvements, and compliance with district rules and regulations.

In the event a lessee has not obtained a new lease pursuant to the provisions of this section, any preemptive right of the lessee to lease the property shall be extinguished upon expiration of the lease, and, at the direction of the district, the lessee shall remove all improvements and other structures on the property immediately upon termination of the lease.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 423, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.